Massachusetts, session 194th, S982.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 16G.5 is hereby amended by inserting the following after subsection c, the
following:-
A city or town may apply to participate in a tenant’s opportunity to purchase pilot
program in the manner provided in section 4 of chapter 4 of the General Laws. The application
will be forwarded to the executive office of housing and livable communities for review and
selection of specific zip codes that meet the criteria of the Anti -Displacement Pilot Program.
The pilot program shall create regulations and standards for no more than fifteen zip
codes to participate. Eligible applicants include: (i) a city or town with zip codes with a high
percentage of rental units at no less than 70 per cent; (ii) a displacement crisis measured by
evictions and applications for Residential Assistance for Families in Transition; and (iii) a high
poverty rate measured by the percentage of people living at or below the federal poverty line.
The office shall promulgate regulations with stakeholders by December 31, 2025, and shall
of 2

accept applicants by June 30, 2026. The pilot program shall last for 5 years and shall end with
the office producing a report that shall address recommendations for improvement, expansion,
continuance, or termination.
of 2